Virginia statutes. Title 59.1. Trade and Commerce.
Article 4. Local Referendum.

§ 59.1-391.
Local referendum required.

The Commission shall not grant any initial license to construct, establish, operate or own a racetrack or satellite facility until a referendum approving the question is held in each county, city, or town in which such track or satellite facility is to
be located, in the following manner:

A petition, signed by five percent of the qualified voters of such county, city, or town shall be filed with the circuit court of such county, city, or town asking that a referendum be held on the question, “Shall pari-mutuel wagering be permitted at
a licensed racetrack in (name of such county, city, or town) on live horse racing at, and on simulcast horse racing transmitted from another jurisdiction to, the licensed racetrack on such days as may be approved by the Virginia
Racing Commission in accordance with Chapter 29 (§ 59.1-364 et seq.) of Title 59.1 of the Code of Virginia?” In addition, or in the alternative, such petition may ask that a referendum be held on the question, “Shall pari-mutuel
wagering be permitted in . . . . . . . . . . . . (the name of such county, city, or town) at satellite facilities in accordance with Chapter 29 (§ 59.1-364 et seq.) of Title 59.1 of the Code of Virginia?”

Following the filing of such petition, the court shall, by order of record entered in accordance with §

24.2-684.1

, require the regular election officers of such city, county, or town to cause a special election to be held to take the sense of the qualified voters on the question. Such election shall be on a day designated by
order of such court, but shall not be later than the next general election unless such general election is within 60 days of the date of the entry of such order, nor shall it be held on a date designated as a primary election.

The clerk of such court of record of such city, county, or town shall publish notice of such election in a newspaper of general circulation in such city, county, or town once a week for three consecutive weeks prior to such election.

The regular election officers of such city or county shall open the polls at the various voting places in such city or county on the date specified in such order and conduct such election in the manner provided by law. The election shall be by ballot
which shall be prepared by the electoral board of the city, county, or town and on which shall be printed either or both of the following questions:“Shall pari-mutuel wagering be permitted at a licensed racetrack in . . . . . .
. . . . . . on live horse racing at, and on simulcast horse racing transmitted from another jurisdiction to, the licensed racetrack on such days as may be approved by the Virginia Racing Commission in accordance with Chapter 29
(§ 59.1-364 et seq.) of Title 59.1 of the Code of Virginia?[ ] Yes[ ] No”“Shall pari-mutuel wagering be permitted in . . . . . . . . . . . . at satellite facilities in accordance with Chapter 29 (§ 59.1-364 et seq.) of Title 59.1
of the Code of Virginia?[ ] Yes[ ] No”In the blank shall be inserted the name of the city, county, or town in which such election is held. Any voter desiring to vote “Yes” shall mark a check (π) mark or a cross (x or +) mark or
a line (-) in the square provided for such purpose immediately preceding the word “Yes,” leaving the square immediately preceding the word “No” unmarked. Any voter desiring to vote “No” shall mark a check (π) mark or a cross (x
or +) mark or a line (-) in the square provided for such purpose immediately preceding the word “No,” leaving the square immediately preceding the word “Yes” unmarked.The ballots shall be counted, returns made and canvassed as
in other elections, and the results certified by the electoral board to the court ordering such election. Thereupon, such court shall enter an order proclaiming the results of such election and a duly certified copy of such order
shall be transmitted to the Commission and to the governing body of such city, county, or town.No such referendum as described above shall be held more often than every three years in the same county, city, or town.A subsequent
local referendum shall be required if a license has not been granted by the Commission within five years of the court order proclaiming the results of the election. Town, for purposes of this section, means any town with a population
of 5,000 or more.

History.
1988, c. 855; 1989, c. 145; 1991, c. 591; 1992, c. 820; 1998, c. 619; 2001, c. 539; 2003, c. 682.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1197 and 1248, cl. 7 provide: “That the Virginia Racing Commission (the Commission) shall authorize an additional 600 historical racing terminals each time a local referendum required by §

58.1-4123

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, is approved, provided that the total number of additional machines authorized in this enactment shall not exceed 2,000 statewide. The tax rate for any machine added pursuant
to this enactment clause shall be 20 percent as calculated and distributed pursuant to the method used to calculate and distribute such rate in effect for machines in existence as of January 1, 2020. For every 100 additional machines
authorized pursuant to this enactment clause, the total number of live horse racing days shall be increased by one day. Excluding machines installed as of March 1, 2020, each location operating historical racing terminals shall be
prohibited from having more than forty percent of its terminals manufactured by any single manufacturer. The increase in historical racing terminals shall not apply with respect to any city where a significant infrastructure limited
licensee, as defined in § 59.1-365 of the Code of Virginia, or the affiliate of such licensee is awarded a casino operator’s license pursuant to this act. Notwithstanding the provisions of 11VAC10-47-180 and subject to the local referendum
requirements of § 59.1-391 of the Code of Virginia, for the machines specifically authorized in this enactment, the Commission shall authorize up to 1,650 machines in a satellite facility in a metropolitan area with a population in
excess of 2.5 million located in a jurisdiction that has passed a referendum pursuant to the requirements of § 59.1-391 of the Code of Virginia prior to January 1, 2020, and 500 machines in a metropolitan area with a population in
excess of 300,000, provided that no additional machines authorized in this enactment shall be located within 35 miles of an eligible host city as described in §

58.1-4107

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act. No satellite facility shall be authorized in any locality that is included in the Regional Improvement Commission established in the fifth enactment of this act. Population
determinations pursuant to this enactment shall be based on the 2018 population estimates from the Weldon Cooper Center for Public Service of the University of Virginia. Except as provided herein, the Commission shall not be authorized
to promulgate regulations to allow or grant a license to authorize historical horse racing terminals in excess of those permitted by the emergency regulations that became effective on October 5, 2018.”

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 110 F 5, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “For any local referendum passed pursuant to § 59.1-391 after July 1, 2020, the Virginia Racing Commission shall
not authorize any additional satellite facilities as defined in § 59.1-365 of the Code of Virginia, or additional simulcast wagering terminals pursuant to 11 VAC 10-47-180, during a period of two years after the effective date of this
act.”

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 539, in subdivision 1, deleted “in name of such county or city” following “wagering be permitted” and inserted the language beginning “in (name of such county or city)” and ending “by the Virginia Racing Commission,” and in the
second paragraph of subdivision 4, deleted “in . . . . ” following “Shall pari-mutuel wagering be permitted” and inserted “in . . . . on live horse racing at, and on simulcast horse racing transmitted from another jurisdiction to,
the licensed racetrack on such days as may be approved by the Virginia Racing Commission.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 682 substituted “county, city, or town” for “county or city” in the introductory paragraph, three times in subdivision 1, and once in the next-to-last paragraph; substituted “city, county, or town” for “city or county” once in
subdivision 2, subdivision 4, and in the third and fourth paragraphs from the end; substituted “60 days” for “sixty days” in subdivision 2; and added the second sentence of the last paragraph.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Referendum on pari-mutuel wagering. —

A referendum on the question of whether pari-mutuel wagering should be permitted at a licensed racetrack and/or satellite facilities must be presented to the qualified voters of a county or city. Voter approval of pari-mutuel wagering on live horse racing
at a licensed racetrack constitutes voter approval of pari-mutuel wagering on simulcast horse racing at that licensed racetrack; however, voter approval of pari-mutuel wagering at a licensed racetrack does not constitute voter approval
of pari-mutuel wagering at satellite facilities. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Robert G. Marshall, Member, House of Delegates, 99-084, 2000 Va. AG LEXIS 13 (2/11/00).